Louisiana, session 2026, SB56.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 38:291(Y), 330.1(B)(2)(a), the introductory paragraph of
330.1(C)(1)(b), 330.1(C)(1)(b)(iii), 330.3(A), (B)(1), and (C)(1), and 330.10(A) are hereby
amended and reenacted and R.S. 38:330.1(C)(1)(b)(iv), 330.5(C), and 330.7(D) are hereby
enacted to read as follows:
§291. Naming; limits of districts; composition of boards
* * *
Y. Lafitte Area Independent Levee District. (1)(a) The West Jefferson Levee
District as it existed on January 1, 2011, is reorganized as provided by this Paragraph
and as provided by Paragraph (R)(1) of this Section. The Lafitte Area Independent
Levee District as it existed on January 1, 2011, is reorganized as provided by this
Paragraph and as provided by this Subsection shall be comprised of all of the lands
in the parish of Jefferson, lying north of Latitude 29° 17' 52" N and lying south of
Page 1 of 8
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 56 ENROLLED
29° 47' 00" N.
(b) These lands and all property thereon situated, not exempt from taxation,
shall be subject to the provisions of this Chapter.
(2) The governor shall appoint, subject to Senate confirmation, a board of
commissioners consisting of five persons who reside in that portion of Jefferson
Parish located within the levee district and who meet the requirements of R.S.
38:304(A) as follows:
(a) One member shall be appointed from a list containing three nominations
from the governing authority of Jean Lafitte.
(2)(a) On and after August 1, 2026, the district shall be governed by the
board of commissioners of the Southeast Louisiana Flood Protection Authority-
West Bank pursuant to authority granted by Article VI, Sections 38 and 38.1 of
the Constitution of Louisiana and as provided in this Chapter.
(b) Four members shall be appointed at-large from a list of six nominations
submitted jointly by the legislative delegation representing that portion of Jefferson
Parish located within the levee district.
(c) Members shall be nominated and appointed such that there are always at
least two professionals with at least ten years of experience in their respective
professional disciplines on the board, one of whom shall be an engineer.
(3) A vacancy created whether by reason of death, resignation, expiration of
term, or any other cause of a member of the board shall be filled in the same manner
as provided in Paragraph (2) of this Subsection.
(4)(a) The members of the board initially appointed shall at their first meeting
determine by lot their terms of office, which terms shall commence immediately
upon their appointment and shall expire, respectively, as follows: one member in two
years, two members in three years, and two members in four years, from the first day
of July immediately succeeding such appointment. Thereafter all terms shall be four
years.
(b) No member shall serve more than four consecutive four-year terms.
However, if a person has been appointed to fill more than one-half of an unexpired
Page 2 of 8
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 56 ENROLLED
term, such person shall be eligible to serve consecutively no more than three terms
in addition to such partial term.
(5) The official domicile of the board of the district shall be established by
the board.
(6) The district shall have such taxing authority as authorized by Article VI,
Section 39(A) and (B) of the Constitution of Louisiana and other applicable
provisions of law.
(7) Any books, records, documents, movable property, lands, or immovable
property owned by the West Jefferson Levee District situated within the Lafitte Area
Independent Levee District, that are owned by or in the possession of the West
Jefferson Levee District and that are situated in or pertain to the operations in the
jurisdiction of the Lafitte Area Independent Levee District shall, on June 29, 2011,
become property of and shall be transferred to the Lafitte Area Independent Levee
District without the necessity of any other act, instrument, or deed.
* * *
§330.1. Southeast Louisiana Flood Protection Authority-East and Southeast
Louisiana Flood Protection Authority-West Bank; territorial
jurisdiction; board of commissioners; appointments; terms;
compensation; vacancy; officers; meetings; domicile
* * *
B. Each flood protection authority, through its board of commissioners as
provided for in this Section, shall exercise all authority over and have management,
oversight, and control of the following territories as provided by law for the boards
of commissioners of such levee districts to which the authority is a successor and to
the extent provided for in this Part:
* * *
(2)(a) The following levee districts and parts of levee districts and parishes
shall be included within the Southeast Louisiana Flood Protection Authority-West
Bank:
(i) West Jefferson Levee District.
Page 3 of 8
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 56 ENROLLED
(ii) The Algiers Levee District.
(iii) The Lafitte Area Levee District.
* * *
C.(1) There is hereby created a board of commissioners for each flood
protection authority as follows:
* * *
(b) The board of commissioners of the Southeast Louisiana Flood Protection
Authority-West Bank shall be composed of seven nine members of whom two three
shall reside in Jefferson Parish on the west side of the Mississippi River within the
jurisdiction of the authority West Jefferson Levee District, one shall reside within
the territorial jurisdiction of the Lafitte Area Levee District, two shall reside in
Orleans Parish on the west side of the Mississippi River, and three shall reside
outside of Jefferson and Orleans parishes. The members shall be appointed by the
governor from nominations submitted by the nominating committee as follows:
* * *
(iii) One member Three members who shall possess the qualifications set
forth in either Item (i) or (ii) of this Subparagraph.
(iv) The member appointed from the territorial jurisdiction of the Lafitte
Area Levee District shall be selected from a list of three individuals, submitted
by the mayor of Jean Lafitte and approved by the town council. The list shall
then be forwarded to the state senator for Senate District No. 8 and the state
representative for House District No. 84, who shall jointly select and submit one
nominee to the governor for appointment.
* * *
§330.3. Levee district and board reorganization; transfer of authority; obligations;
taxes; lands
A.(1)(a) Any legal proceeding to which the East Jefferson Levee District,
Lake Borgne Basin Levee District, Orleans Levee District, or West Jefferson Levee
District is a party and which is filed, initiated, or pending before any court on
January 1, 2007, and all documents involved in or affected by said legal proceeding,
Page 4 of 8
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 56 ENROLLED
shall retain its effectiveness and shall be continued in the name of the district. Other
than the district or districts originally named as party to the proceedings, neither an
authority or district within the territorial jurisdiction of the authority shall have any
liability for actions pending or claims arising prior to the effective date of this
Section.
(b) Any legal proceeding to which the Lafitte Area Levee District is a
party and which is filed, initiated or pending before any court on August 1,
2026, and all documents involved in or affected by any legal proceeding, shall
retain its effectiveness and shall be continued in the name of the Lafitte Area
Levee District.
(c) Other than the district or districts originally named as a party to the
proceedings, neither an authority or district within the territorial jurisdiction
of the authority shall have any liability for actions pending or claims arising
prior to August 1, 2026.
(b)(d) Neither an authority nor any district within the territorial jurisdiction
of the authority shall have any liability for actions or claims other than the district
against which the actions or claims arise.
(c)(e) Except as provided in this Subparagraph, Paragraph (B)(4) of this
Section, and R.S. 38:330.8(B), no provision of law providing the Southeast
Louisiana Flood Protection Authority-East or Southeast Louisiana Flood Protection
Authority-West Bank with any authority over and management, oversight, and
control of the areas and levee districts provided for in R.S. 38:330.2(A) shall be
construed or interpreted to make the taxes levied by, or other revenue of, a levee
district within the territorial jurisdiction of the authority payable for the liability of
another levee district, or for any liability of the authority when acting on behalf of
another levee district. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary,
taxes and other revenues generated in one or more levee districts within the
jurisdiction of a levee authority may be used within any portion of the territorial
jurisdiction of the authority if use of the funds will benefit all or a portion of the
authority and the levee districts from which the taxes or revenues are generated.
Page 5 of 8
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 56 ENROLLED
(2) All obligations and unfinished business of the East Jefferson Levee
District, Lake Borgne Basin Levee District, Orleans Levee District, and West
Jefferson Levee District, and Lafitte Area Levee District shall be managed on
behalf of the districts by the appropriate authority.
(3) All outstanding indebtedness of the East Jefferson Levee District, Lake
Borgne Basin Levee District, Orleans Levee District, and West Jefferson Levee
District, and Lafitte Area Levee District shall remain with the district and shall not
be a liability of any authority.
B.(1) The proceeds of all taxes collected on all property taxed in the parishes
of Jefferson, Orleans, and St. Bernard for the purpose of constructing and
maintaining levees, levee drainage, flood protection, hurricane flood protection, and
for all other purposes incidental thereto, by or on behalf of the Algiers Levee
District, East Jefferson Levee District, Lake Borgne Basin Levee District, Orleans
Levee District, or West Jefferson Levee District, or Lafitte Area Levee District,
and, except as provided in R.S. 38:330.12, any other revenue from operations of such
districts shall be administered by the board of commissioners of the applicable flood
protection authority; however, the taxes and other revenues of each such levee
district shall only be used and expended for the purposes of such district.
* * *
C.(1) Any books, records, documents, funds, movable property, lands or
immovable property owned by the Algiers Levee District, East Jefferson Levee
District, Lake Borgne Basin Levee District, Orleans Levee District, and West
Jefferson Levee District, and Lafitte Area Levee District shall be retained as
property of the respective levee district in which such property is situated, but shall
be managed by the applicable flood protection authority, except as provided in R.S.
38:330.12.
* * *
§330.5. Employees
* * *
C. For purposes of this Part, the Southeast Louisiana Flood Protection
Page 6 of 8
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 56 ENROLLED
Authority-East board of commissioners may hire a compliance officer. The
position shall be in the classified service of the state. The compliance officer
shall possess the following credentials and experience:
(1) A bachelor's degree in accounting, auditing, business, finance, legal
studies, or related fields.
(2) A minimum of two years of industry specific experience.
(3) A Certified Compliance and Ethics Professional credential.
* * *
§330.7. Police officers
* * *
D.(1) The superintendent of police shall serve as the chief law
enforcement officer of the Southeast Louisiana Flood Protection Authority East
and its constituent levee districts pursuant to R.S. 38:330.1(B)(1)(a), and shall
be responsible solely for the execution, direction, and supervision of law
enforcement operations within the territorial jurisdiction of the flood authority.
(2) The authority of the superintendent of police shall be limited
exclusively to matters directly related to law enforcement operations, including
the prevention, detection, and investigation of crime and the enforcement of
applicable criminal and motor vehicle traffic laws and ordinances.
(3) The superintendent of police shall not exercise any authority over any
administrative, fiscal, personnel, procurement, policy-making, or other nonlaw
enforcement functions of the Southeast Louisiana Flood Protection Authority
East or its constituent levee districts.
(4) Nothing in this Section shall be construed to grant the superintendent
of police authority beyond operational law enforcement responsibilities, nor to
diminish the authority of any other official or entity lawfully responsible for
administrative governance.
* * *
§330.10. Statutory reference
A. Subject to the limitations of liability as set forth in R.S. 38:330.3,
Page 7 of 8
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 56 ENROLLED
whenever a reference to the "board of commissioners", "levee board" or "board of
levee commissioners" of the Algiers Levee District, East Jefferson Levee District,
Lake Borgne Basin Levee District, Orleans Levee District, or West Jefferson Levee
District, or Lafitte Area Levee District appears in any statute, or in a contract, or
a legal pleading, or in any other document, that reference shall be deemed to be a
reference to the board of commissioners of the Southeast Louisiana Flood Protection
Authority-East or the board of commissioners of the Southeast Louisiana Flood
Protection Authority-West Bank West Bank Levee Authority, as applicable.
* * *
Section 2. The Louisiana State Law Institute is hereby directed to make technical
changes to statutory laws as necessary to reflect the succession of the Lafitte Area
Independent Levee District by the Lafitte Area Levee District as provided in this Act.
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 8 of 8
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.